Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.090

Final order of abatement.

Any final order of abatement issued under this chapter shall:

(1) Direct the removal of all personal property subject to seizure and forfeiture pursuant to RCW 69.50.505 from the building or unit within a building, and direct their disposition pursuant to the forfeiture provisions of RCW 69.50.505;

(2) Provide for the immediate closure of the building or unit within a building against its use for any purpose, and for keeping it closed for a period of one year unless released sooner as provided in this chapter; and

(3) State that while the order of abatement remains in effect the building or unit within a building shall remain in the custody of the court.

[ 1988 c 141 s 12.]